Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-409
Campus buildings and facilities; utilities; board furnish.

The respective boards, referred to in section 85-403, in their discretion may furnish heat, light, power, and other similar utilities to any building or structure, or for any activities covered by the provisions of sections 85-403 to 85-411, without charging the same against the revenue derived therefrom.

Laws 1955, c. 352, § 7, p. 1077.